Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.040

Resisting arrest.

(1) A person is guilty of resisting arrest if he or she intentionally prevents or attempts to prevent a peace officer from lawfully arresting him or her.

(2) Resisting arrest is a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 399; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.040.]